Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1750
Collection of taxes; settlement of county treasurer; adjustment with county clerk; order by county board.

In all cases when the adjustment is made with the county clerk, the county board shall, at the first session thereafter, examine such settlement and if found correct shall enter an order to that effect. If any omission or error is found, the board shall cause the same to be corrected and a correct statement of the facts in the case forwarded to the Tax Commissioner and other proper authority or person who shall correct and adjust the treasurer's accounts accordingly.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 175, p. 453;

R.S.1913, § 6503;

C.S.1922, § 6031;

C.S.1929, § 77-1936;

R.S.1943, § 77-1750;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 170;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 84.